Wyoming, session 2025, SF0175.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 27-3-102(a)(v), 27-3-304,
27-3-316(c)(ii), 27-3-601(a) and 27-14-802(b) are amended
to read:

27-3-102. Definitions generally.

SF0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0704
(a) Except as otherwise provided, as used in this
act:

(v) "Commission" means the unemployment
reemployment insurance commission of Wyoming within the
department of workforce services;

27-3-304. Maximum payment.

Except as provided by W.S. 27-3-316, the maximum amount of
benefits payable to any eligible individual in a benefit
year shall not exceed twenty-six (26) twenty (20) times his
weekly benefit or thirty percent (30%) of his wages payable
for insured work in his base period, whichever is less.
This amount shall be computed to the next higher multiple
of his weekly benefit.

27-3-316. Applicability of regular claim and payment
provisions to extended benefits; determination of amount.

(c) An eligible individual's total extended benefit
amount for his applicable benefit year is the lesser of:

SF0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0704
(ii) Thirteen (13) Six and one-half (6.5) times
his weekly benefit amount under this article for a week of
total unemployment in the applicable benefit year. A
reduction in an eligible claimant's weekly and potential
maximum extended benefit amount, resulting from the
application of paragraph (b)(i) of this section, will not
increase the number of weeks of extended benefit
entitlement beyond that specified in paragraphs (i) and
(ii) of this subsection.

27-3-601. Reemployment insurance commission created;
composition; terms; vacancies; salary; chairman; quorum;
removal; office; seal.

(a) The unemployment reemployment insurance
commission of Wyoming is created within the department of
workforce services and shall consist of three (3) members
serving a term of six (6) years each. Appointments,
vacancies and expiration of terms shall be in accordance
with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103. A member shall not
hold any state office or serve as an officer or on a
committee of any political organization during the term of
SF0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0704
membership. No more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the
members shall be of the same political party.

27-14-802. Rulemaking power; fees; state's average
wages; vocational rehabilitation; contracts with clerks of
district court.

(b) Before the last day of each quarter in each year,
the department shall estimate the average monthly and
weekly wage for the twelve (12) months preceding the
quarter, based on unemployment reemployment insurance
commission information and other available statistics.

Section 2. There is appropriated eighteen thousand
dollars ($18,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming
department of workforce services for purposes of updating
and administering the Wyoming unemployment insurance
system. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this section and
ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
SF0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0704
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all unemployment
claims filed on and after January 1, 2026.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0175